Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1933
Inspection by department; inspection
report.

The
department may inspect or provide for the inspection of residential child-caring
agencies or child-placing agencies licensed under the Children's Residential
Facilities and Placing Licensure Act in such manner and at such times as provided
in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department. The department
shall issue an inspection report and provide a copy of the report to the agency
within ten working days after the completion of an inspection.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 10.
May 26, 2013